Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 1. Assisted Living Facilities.

§ 63.2-1800.
Licensure requirements.

Each license shall indicate whether the facility is licensed to provide residential living care or residential living and assisted living care.

Any facility licensed exclusively as an assisted living facility shall not use in its title the words “convalescent,” “health,” “hospital,” “nursing,” “sanatorium,” or “sanitarium,” nor shall such words be used to describe the facility in brochures, advertising, or other marketing material. No facility shall advertise or market a level of care that it is not licensed to provide. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the facility from describing services available in the facility.

Upon initial application for a license, any person applying to operate an assisted living facility who has not previously owned or managed or does not currently own or manage such a facility shall be required to undergo training by the Commissioner. The training programs shall focus on health and safety regulations and resident rights as they pertain to assisted living facilities and shall be completed by the owner or administrator prior to the granting of an initial license. Such training shall be required of those owners and currently employed administrators of an assisted living facility at the time of initial application for a license. The Commissioner may also approve training programs provided by other entities and allow owners or administrators to attend such approved training programs in lieu of training by the Commissioner. The Commissioner may also approve for licensure applicants who meet requisite experience criteria as established by the Board. The Commissioner may, at his discretion, issue a license conditioned upon the owner or administrator’s completion of the required training.

For the purpose of facilitating the prompt restoration of electrical service and prioritization of customers during widespread power outages, the Commissioner shall notify on a quarterly basis all electric utilities serving customers in Virginia as to the location of all assisted living facilities licensed in the Commonwealth. The requirements of this subsection shall be met if the Commissioner maintains such information on an electronic database accessible by electric utilities serving customers in Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-23.1; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-175; 1972, c. 540; 1973, c. 227; 1979, c. 461; 1981, c. 222; 1983, c. 153; 1991, c. 532; 1992, c. 666; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1994, c. 686; 1999, c. 964; 2000, cc. 178, 203; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 304.

Cross references.

As to exclusion of information provided to Department of Social Services from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

. As to possession without license to sell alcoholic beverages upon premises of restaurant, see §

4.1-315

. As to inspection of certain state-owned, state-operated, or state-licensed facilities by State Fire Marshal, see §

9.1-207

.

As to community-based continuing care providers, see §

38.2-4918

et seq.

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 304 added subsection D.

§ 63.2-1801.
Access to assisted living facilities by community services boards and behavioral health authorities.

All assisted living facilities shall provide reasonable access to staff or contractual agents of community services boards or behavioral health authorities as defined in §

37.2-100

for the purposes of (i) assessing or evaluating, (ii) providing case management or other services or assistance, or (iii) monitoring the care of individuals receiving services who are residing in the facility. Such staff or contractual agents also shall be given reasonable access to other facility residents who have previously requested their services.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-224; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-177; 1973, c. 227; 1979, c. 73; 1988, cc. 61, 151; 1991, c. 532; 1992, c. 666; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1999, c. 964; 2000, c. 130; 2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 716; 2012, cc. 476, 507.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 716, effective October 1, 2005, deleted “local government departments with policy advisory community services boards” preceding “or behavioral health authorities,” substituted “§

37.2-100

” for “Title 37.1” and substiuted “consumers” for “clients.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “individuals receiving services who are residing” for “consumers residing” in clause (iii).

§ 63.2-1802.
Safe, secure environments for residents with serious cognitive impairments.

Assisted living facilities may provide safe, secure environments for residents with serious cognitive impairments due to a primary psychiatric diagnosis of dementia if they comply with the Board’s regulations governing such placement. The Board’s regulations shall define (i) serious cognitive impairment, which shall include, but not be limited to, an assessment by a clinical psychologist licensed to practice in the Commonwealth or by a physician and (ii) safe, secure environment.

Prior to placing a resident with a serious cognitive impairment due to a primary psychiatric diagnosis of dementia in a safe, secure environment, an assisted living facility shall obtain the written approval of one of the following persons, in the specified order of priority: (i) the resident, if capable of making an informed decision; (ii) a guardian or legal representative for the resident; however, such an appointment shall not be required in order that written approval may be obtained; (iii) a relative authorized pursuant to the Board’s regulations to act as the resident’s representative; or (iv) an independent physician who is skilled and knowledgeable in the diagnosis and treatment of dementia, if a guardian, legal representative or relative is unavailable. Such written approval shall be retained in the resident’s file.

The Board of Social Services shall amend 22VAC40-73-1130 governing staffing of units of assisted living facilities with residents who have serious cognitive impairment due to a primary psychiatric diagnosis of dementia and are unable to recognize danger or protect their own safety and welfare to require that the following number of direct care staff members be awake and on duty and responsible for the care and supervision of the residents at all times during night hours:

When 22 or fewer residents are present, at least two direct care staff members;

When 23 to 32 residents are present, at least three direct care staff members;

When 33 to 40 residents are present, at least four direct care staff members; and

When more than 40 residents are present, at least four direct care staff members plus at least one additional direct care staff member for every 10 residents or portion thereof in excess of 40 residents.Nothing in this subsection shall apply to the provisions of 22VAC40-73-280.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-223; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-174; 1973, c. 227; 1991, c. 532; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1995, c. 649; 1997, c. 397; 2000, cc. 804, 808, 845; 2001, c. 161; 2002, cc. 332, 747; 2003, c. 467; 2019, cc. 97, 294.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 332 amended § 63.1-174, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 332 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 332 substituted “an assessment by a clinical psychologist licensed to practice in the Commonwealth or by a physician” for “a physician assessment” in clause (i) of the second sentence.

Acts 2019, cc. 97 and 294 were codified as subsection C of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 467 twice inserted “psychiatric” preceding “diagnosis.”

§ 63.2-1803.
Staffing of assisted living facilities.

An administrator of an assisted living facility shall be licensed as an assisted living facility administrator by the Virginia Board of Long-Term Care Administrators pursuant to Chapter 31 (§

54.1-3100

et seq.) of Title 54.1. However, an administrator of an assisted living facility licensed for residential living care only shall not be required to be licensed. Any person meeting the qualifications for a licensed nursing home administrator under §

54.1-3103

shall be deemed qualified to (i) serve as an administrator of an assisted living facility or (ii) serve as the administrator of both an assisted living facility and a licensed nursing home, provided the assisted living facility and licensed nursing home are part of the same building.

If a licensed assisted living facility administrator dies, resigns, is discharged, or becomes unable to perform his duties, the assisted living facility shall immediately employ a licensed administrator or appoint an acting administrator who is qualified by education for an approved administrator-in-training program and has a minimum of one year of administrative or supervisory experience in a health care or long-term care facility, or has completed such a program and is awaiting licensure. The facility shall give immediate notice to the regional licensing office of the Department of Social Services and to the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators that the licensed administrator died, resigned, was discharged, or became unable to perform his duties and shall provide the last date of employment of the licensed administrator. When an acting administrator is named, he shall notify the Department of his employment and, if intending to assume the position permanently, submit a completed application for an approved administrator-in-training program to the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators within 10 days of employment. An assisted living facility may be operated by an acting administrator for no more than 150 days, or not more than 90 days if the acting administrator has not applied for licensure, from the last date of employment of the licensed administrator.

The Department may grant an extension of up to 30 days in addition to the 150 days from the last date of employment of a licensed administrator if the acting administrator has applied for licensure as a long-term care administrator pursuant to Chapter 31 (§

54.1-3100

et seq.) of Title 54.1, has completed the administrator-in-training program, and is awaiting the results of the national examination. If a 30-day extension is granted, the acting administrator shall immediately submit written notice to the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators. In no case shall an assisted living facility be operated with an acting administrator for more than 180 days, including the 30-day extension, from the last date of employment of a licensed administrator.

No assisted living facility shall operate under the supervision of an acting administrator pursuant to §

54.1-3103.1

and this section more than two times during any two-year period unless authorized to do so by the Department. Determinations regarding authorization to operate under the supervision of an acting administrator for more than two times in any two-year period shall be made by the Department on a case-by-case basis.

The assisted living facility shall have adequate, appropriate, and sufficient staff to provide services to attain and maintain (i) the physical, mental and psychosocial well-being of each resident as determined by resident assessments and individual plans of care and (ii) the physical safety of the residents on the premises. Upon admission and upon request, the assisted living facility shall provide in writing a description of the types of staff working in the facility and the services provided, including the hours such services are available.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-222, 63-223; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, §§ 63.1-172, 63.1-174; 1972, c. 718; 1973, c. 227; 1975, c. 437; 1977, c. 105; 1985, cc. 17, 518; 1991, c. 532; 1992, c. 356; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1994, c. 107; 1995, c. 649; 1997, c. 397; 1998, cc. 552, 850; 2000, cc. 804, 808, 845; 2001, c. 161; 2002, c. 747; 2003, c. 467; 2005, cc. 610, 924; 2011, c. 609; 2019, c. 448.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 910, provides:
“§ 1. Certain exception to regulations for assisted iving facilities authorized.

“Notwithstanding any provision of §§

63.2-1732

and

63.2-1803

of the Code of Virginia and of 22 VAC 40-71-700 to the contrary, the provisionsof 22 VAC 40-71-700 B 1 and C 14 shall not be applicable to any assisted living facility licensed by the Department of Social Services when such facility (i) offers a safe, secure environment in a freestanding self-contained unit for residents who have been assessed by an independent clinical psychologist or a licensed physician as having a serious cognitive impairment due to a primary diagnosis of dementia; (ii) has an individual facility capacity that does not exceed five residents; (iii) is located in a converted single-family dwelling located in an established residential neighborhood in any county having a population of no less than 259,000 and no greater than 263,000; (iv) has at least one direct care staff member in such facility at all times that residents are present who shall be responsible for the care and supervision of the residents; (v) has established written emergency procedures that provide for prompt assistance to the direct caregiver by other staff members who may be located at locations other than the facility where the assistance is requested; (vi) is operated by aVirginia limited liability company that operatesat least three such facilities with a combined minimum of 15 residents; and (vii) has provided written notice to the resident and his legally authorized representative at the time of admission that one direct care staff member rather than two are present at all times.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.” Regulations became effective January 2, 2008.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 7 provides: “That, notwithstanding the due course effective date of this act, the provisions of this act in §§

54.1-3102

,

54.1-3103.1

and

63.2-1803

shall not be implemented or enforced until 12 months after the regulations promulgated pursuant to the sixth enactment become effective.” Regulations became effective January 2, 2008.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

Acts 2011, c. 609, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall promulgate regulations for the oversight of acting administrators of assisted living facilities who have sought licensure but who are not yet licensed as long-term care administrators by a preceptor registered or recognized by the Board.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 467 substituted “or ” for “and ” preceding clause (ii) in subsection A.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 610 and 924 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “is any person meeting the qualifications for administrator” preceding “of an assisted living facility,” substituted “shall be licensed as an assisted living facility administrator by the Virginia Board of Long-Term Care Administrators pursuant to Chapter 31 (§

54.1-3100

et seq.) of Title 54.1” for “pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board,” and inserted the second sentence; and inserted “appropriate” in the first sentence of subsection B. For implementation date, see Editor’s notes.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 609 added subsections B through D and redesignated former subsection B as subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 448, in subsection B, inserted “that the licensed administrator died, resigned, was discharged, or became unable to perform his duties”; and in subsection D, substituted “two times” for “one time” twice.

§ 63.2-1803.01.
Possession or administration of cannabis oil.

Assisted living facility staff members who are authorized to possess, distribute, or administer medications to residents in accordance with the facility’s written plan for medication management shall be permitted to store, dispense, or administer cannabis oil to a resident who has been issued a valid written certification for the use of cannabis oil in accordance with subsection B of §

54.1-3408.3

and has registered with the Board of Pharmacy.

History.

2020, c. 846.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “cannabis oil” was substituted for “cannabidiol oil or THC-A oil” to conform with Acts 2020, c. 1278.

§ 63.2-1803.1.
Assisted Living Facility Education, Training, and Technical Assistance Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Assisted Living Facility Education, Training, and Technical Assistance Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All penalties directed to this fund by subdivision B 4 of §

63.2-1709.2

and all other funds from any public or private source directed to the Fund shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purpose of providing education and training for staff of and technical assistance to assisted living facilities to improve the quality of care in such facilities. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner.

History.

2005, cc. 610, 924.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

§ 63.2-1804.
Uniform assessment instrument.

A uniform assessment instrument setting forth a resident’s care needs shall be completed for all residents upon admission and at subsequent intervals as determined by regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. No uniform assessment instrument shall be required to be completed upon admission if a uniform assessment instrument was completed by a case manager or other qualified assessor within ninety days prior to such admission to the assisted living facility unless there has been a change in the resident’s condition within that time which would affect the admission. Uniform assessment instruments shall not be required to be completed more often than once every twelve months on individuals residing in assisted living facilities except that uniform assessment instruments shall be completed whenever there is a change in the resident’s condition that appears to warrant a change in the resident’s approved level of care. At the request of the assisted living facility, the resident’s representative, the resident’s physician, the Department or the local department, an independent assessment, using the uniform assessment instrument shall be completed to determine whether the resident’s care needs are being met in the current placement. The resident’s case manager or other qualified assessor shall complete the uniform assessment instrument for public pay residents or, upon request by the private pay resident, for private pay residents. Unless a private pay resident requests the uniform assessment instrument be completed by a case manager or other qualified assessor, qualified staff of the assisted living facility or an independent private physician may complete the uniform assessment instrument for private pay residents; however, for private pay residents, social and financial information which is not relevant because of the resident’s payment status shall not be required. The cost of administering the uniform assessment instrument pursuant to this section shall be borne by the entity designated pursuant to regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services. Upon receiving the uniform assessment instrument prior to admission of a resident, the assisted living facility administrator shall provide written assurance that the facility has the appropriate license to meet the care needs of the resident at the time of admission.

History.

1993, cc. 957, 993, § 63.1-173.3; 1995, c. 649; 2002, c. 747; 2014, c. 284.

Cross references.

As to provision by local board of social services of assisted living facility assessments of residents and applicants pursuant to §

63.2-1804

, see §

63.2-1602

.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 284, at the end of the first sentence substituted “regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Board regulation,”and at the end of the next-to-last sentence, substituted
“regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Board regulations.”